Illinois, session 104th, SB1439.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Best 5Customer Price Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 7declares that:8        (1) It has been the long-standing public policy of 9    this State to provide a level playing field in procurement 10    for small and mid-sized businesses. Despite this policy, 11    the portion of State funds spent on small and mid-sized 12    businesses, especially minority-owned, women-owned, and 13    veteran-owned businesses, is persistently far below where 14    the General Assembly believes it should be.15        (2) This State has a choice in implementing pricing 16    policy for goods. Manufacturers sometimes give their best 17    price to the largest suppliers and largest resellers, 18    leaving small and mid-sized suppliers and small and 19    mid-sized resellers to pay a higher price. Allowing 20    manufacturers to force smaller suppliers for State 21    purchases to pay a higher price excludes small suppliers 22    from any low-bid State procurement.23        (3) On average, minority-owned, women-owned, and   SB1439- 2 -LRB104 08974 SPS 19029 b1    veteran-owned businesses are smaller than incumbent firms, 2    and policies that level the playing field in procurement 3    for firms that are smaller will disproportionately benefit 4    minority-owned, women-owned and veteran-owned businesses, 5    rectifying past decades of discrimination in a 6    race-neutral and gender-neutral way.7        (4) It has long been public policy to empower State 8    purchasing officials with the ability to require the most 9    favorable terms to be granted to this State on any 10    purchase of supplies or services, and extending this 11    policy to ensure the best customer pricing is extended by 12    manufacturers to this State's suppliers and resellers is 13    consistent with both federal procurement law and State 14    procurement law.15        (5) Requiring the best customer price for procured 16    goods will create a more inclusive choice for State 17    procurement and a level playing field for all suppliers, 18    both from the manufacturers to suppliers or resellers and 19    from suppliers or resellers to this State.20        (6) It is in the best interest of the taxpayers of this 21    State to ensure that this State's purchases of goods 22    always get the best customer pricing from all participants 23    in the transaction, both from the manufacturer to the 24    supplier or reseller and from the supplier or reseller to 25    this State.   SB1439- 3 -LRB104 08974 SPS 19029 b1    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    "Best customer pricing" means the best price offered to 3any customer for the goods this State is seeking to buy, 4including price, discounts, commissions, rebates, and other 5incentives that impact the consideration paid for the good.6    "Letter of supply" means a document from the manufacturer 7to a supplier or reseller that indicates the supplier or 8reseller is able to secure the goods this State seeks to buy.9    "Public institution of higher education" has the meaning 10given to that term in Section 1-13 of the Illinois Procurement 11Code.12    "Reseller" means a registered vendor of this State that 13supplies goods the company does not manufacture.14    "State agency" has the meaning given to that term in 15Section 1-15.100 of the Illinois Procurement Code.16    "Supplier" means a registered vendor of this State that 17supplies goods the company does not manufacture. 18    Section 15. Best consumer pricing. 19    (a) A public institution of higher education or a State 20agency may require best customer pricing for any goods it 21procures. If goods are to be purchased by this State from a 22supplier or reseller, the supplier or reseller shall attest 23that the price is the best customer price. The supplier or 24reseller shall include a provision in the letter of supply 25from the manufacturer that the supplier or reseller can secure   SB1439- 4 -LRB104 08974 SPS 19029 b1the supply and quantity of goods to be purchased, and that the 2manufacturer has extended the same best customer pricing from 3the manufacturer to each of the suppliers or resellers 4registered with this State for the goods to be purchased. 5    (b) Nothing in this Section shall require the manufacturer 6to extend best customer pricing to any supplier or reseller 7for any goods that are not purchased by this State.8    (c) Nothing in this Section shall regulate or impact any 9commercial relationship between a manufacturer and a supplier 10or reseller for any goods that are not the subject of a State 11purchase.12    (d) Nothing in this Section shall require any 13manufacturer, reseller, or supplier to disclose any 14proprietary information in the letter of supply. 15    Section 20. Declining bids. If a public institution of 16higher education or a State agency requires best customer 17pricing for the goods but does not believe the price is 18competitive, the public institution of higher education or the 19State agency may decline to award the bid. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.